Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-229
School lands; sale; county clerk; entry upon tax list.

Upon the sale of school lands, the Board of Educational Lands and Funds is directed to state the actual purchase price in the deed so that the amount actually paid will be known when the deed is recorded even though the recording is exempt from the documentary stamp tax. The county clerks of the respective counties are directed to enter such lands upon the tax list of the county upon the recording of such a deed.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 12, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 5858;

C.S.1922, § 5194;

C.S.1929, § 72-214;

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 9, p. 602;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-214;

R.S.1943, § 72-229;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 21.